Washington statutes.
RCW 18.53.190

Discrimination prohibited—Application of law.

RCW 18.53.165 through 18.53.185 shall apply to all agreements, renewals, or contracts issued on or after June 7, 1973.

Health care service contracts having a participant agreement with a majority of the licensed optometrists within its service area may provide benefits to persons or groups of persons through contracts which allow a subscriber to utilize on an equal participation basis the services of any participant provided in the contract, and such contracts shall not be discriminatory.

[ 1975 1st ex.s. c 69 s 8; 1973 c 48 s 6.]